Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.344

University site dedicated for street and boulevard purposes—Eminent domain may not be exercised against site.

The power of eminent domain of any municipal or other corporation whatever is hereby declared not to extend to any portion of said section 16, township 25 north, range 4 east, W.M., and blocks 7 and 8 of Lake Washington shorelands.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.344. Prior: 1913 c 24 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.77.300.]